District of Columbia statutes.
10-225

Services on reimbursable basis.

The Board is authorized to arrange with other governmental agencies for services on a reimbursable basis.

Apr. 29, 1942, 56 Stat. 264, ch. 265, art. III, § 5
1981 Ed., § 8-225.
1973 Ed., § 8-218.
Recreation Board abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 10-201.